Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0612

Action without meeting.

(1) Unless prohibited by the organic rules, any action that may be taken by a board of directors may be taken without a meeting if each director consents in a record to the action.

(2) Consent under subsection (1) of this section may be withdrawn by a director in a record at any time before the limited cooperative association receives consent from all directors.

(3) A record of consent for any action under subsection (1) of this section may specify the effective date or time of the action.

[ 2019 c 37 s 612.]